District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
20 act may be cited as the "St. Elizabeths East Parcel 13 Extension of Disposition Authority
21 Amendment Act of 2025".
22 Sec. 2. The St. Elizabeths East Parcel 13 Surplus Declaration and Disposition Approval
23 Act of 2022, effective March 10, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-0297; 70 DCR 3528) is amended as
24 follows:
25 (a) Section 2(4) is amended by striking the phrase "the Neighborhood Development
26 Company, L.L.C., a District of Columbia limited liability company with a business address of
27 3232 Georgia Avenue N.W., Suite 100, Washington, D.C. 20010" and inserting the phrase
28 "Dantes Partners Acquisitions, L.L.C., a District of Columbia limited liability company with a
29 business address of 1121 12th Street N.W., Washington, D.C. 20005" in its place.
30 (b) Section 3(f) is amended to read as follows:

31 “(f) The Mayor, through the Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
32 Development, selected a developer to develop the Property and thereafter approved the
33 assignment of the development rights from that developer to the Developer.”.
34 (c) Section 4(b) is amended by striking the phrase “2 years after the effective date” and
35 inserting the phrase “6 years after the effective date” in its place.
36 Sec. 3. Applicability.
37 This act shall apply as of March 9, 2025.
38 Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
39 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
40 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
41 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
42 Sec. 5. Effective date.
43 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
44 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
45 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
46 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
47 Columbia Register.
2

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: September 16, 2024
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – St. Elizabeths East Parcel 13 Extension of
Disposition Authority Amendment Act of 2024
REFERENCE: Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on August 22,
2024
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2025 budget and the fiscal year 2025 through fiscal year 2028
budget and financial plan to implement the bill.
Background
The St. Elizabeths campus is a National Historic Landmark located in Southeast Washington, D.C., and
is comprised of a West and East campus. In 1987, the federal government transferred ownership of
the East campus to the District. The St. Elizabeths East redevelopment framework plan and the
subsequent St. Elizabeths East Master Plan and Design Guidelines1 established the vision, scope, and
details for the District’s proposed revitalization of the East campus.
The St. Elizabeths East Parcel 13 Surplus Declaration and Disposition Approval Act of 20222 declared
Parcel 13 as surplus and allowed its disposal for private development. Parcel 13 is approximately
138,162 square feet of vacant land located at 1100 Alabama Avenue, S.E. The disposition authority is
in effect for two years from the bill’s effective date, through March 10, 2025. This bill amends the
sunset date to four years from the surplus declaration, or through March 10, 2027.
1 St. Elizabeths East Master Plan and Design Guidelines. 21087-GL-
DRAFT_2012_0605_FINAL_with_appendices.pdf (stelizabethseast.com)
2 Effective from Mar 10, 2023, 70 D.C. Register 003528.
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “St. Elizabeths East Parcel 13 Extension of Disposition Authority Amendment Act of 2024”, Draft bill as
provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on August 22, 2024
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2025 budget and the fiscal year 2025 through fiscal year 2028
budget and financial plan to implement the bill. There are no costs associated with extending the
parcel’s authorized disposition date.
Page 2 of 2

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB
ATTORNEY GENERAL
Legal Counsel Division
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Megan D. Browder
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: October 29, 2024
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of the St. Elizabeths East Parcel 13 Extension of Disposition
Authority Amendment Act of 2024
(AE-24-380-B)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
St. Elizabeths East Parcel 13 Extension of Disposition Authority Amendment Act of 2024 and
determined that it is legally sufficient. If you have any questions, please do not hesitate to call me at
(202)724-5524.
_________________________________
Megan D. Browder
2